Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.790

Interim zoning.

If the planning agency in good faith, is conducting or intends to conduct studies within a reasonable time for the purpose of, or is holding a hearing for the purpose of, or has held a hearing and has recommended to the board the adoption of any zoning map or amendment or addition thereto, or in the event that new territory for which no zoning may have been adopted as set forth in RCW 36.70.800 may be annexed to a county, the board, in order to protect the public safety, health and general welfare may, after report from the commission, adopt as an emergency measure a temporary interim zoning map the purpose of which shall be to so classify or regulate uses and related matters as constitute the emergency.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.790. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 79.]